Rhode Island statutes. Title 43 Statutes and Statutory Construction
Chapter 2 Publication and Distribution of Acts

43-2-1.
Numbering of public laws.

All acts of a public nature shall be numbered as chapters, continuously in the order of their passage commencing with the first act passed in the January session of each year and continuing to the end of the year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 22, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2050, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 28, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 307, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

43-2-1

.

43-2-2.
References to public laws amended or repealed.

Every act amending or repealing a public law shall, immediately preceding the public law to be amended or repealed, refer to the law by the number and name of the chapter containing the law amended or repealed, and to the year of its passage; provided, that any failure to include the reference shall not invalidate or otherwise render void the act.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 22, § 2; P.L. 1907, ch. 1459, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 28, § 2; P.L. 1921, ch. 2050, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 28, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 307, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

43-2-2

; P.L. 1970, ch. 2, § 1.

43-2-2.1.
Assignment of official section number of general laws.

When an act of a general and permanent nature passed by the general assembly becomes a law and is filed with the secretary of state, the law revision director of the joint committee on legislative services shall examine the act and, if as enacted it has not been assigned to sections of the general laws or if section numbers of the general laws have been improperly assigned, the law revision director of the joint committee on legislative services shall assign each section of the act, which is proper for incorporation in the general laws, an official section number of the general laws. Where necessary, sections may be combined or divided in the assignment of the numbers. The assigned official section numbers shall be entered upon the original bill, as enacted. Sections of the general laws shall be cited and referred to by the assigned official numbers and may be amended by reference thereto. The official section numbers of the general laws as assigned by the law revision director of the joint committee on legislative services shall be used in the publication of the public laws, and internal section references in any act shall be changed to correspond to the assigned official numbers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 153, § 4.

43-2-3.
Deposit and safekeeping of original acts, resolutions, and proceedings.

The original acts, resolutions, and other proceedings of the general assembly shall be deposited and safely kept in the office of the department of state and shall not be removed from that office except upon the order of the general assembly or upon process issued by the supreme or superior court or by a justice of either of the courts.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 22, § 3; C.P.A. 1905, § 1085; G.L. 1909, ch. 28, § 3; P.L. 1921, ch. 2050, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 28, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 307, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

43-2-3

.

43-2-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 22, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 28, § 4; P.L. 1921, ch. 2050, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 28, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 307, § 4; P.L. 1956, ch. 3704, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

43-2-4

; P.L. 1970, ch. 55, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1972, ch. 201, § 3.

43-2-5.
Distribution of copies of proceedings.

The joint committee on legislative services shall, as soon as possible after publication of the public laws, acts of a local and private nature, and resolutions as provided in §

22-11-3.3

, transmit bound copies to each of the following officers, libraries, or societies. The copies shall be transmitted by the recipients to their successors in office:

One copy each to the governor, lieutenant governor, justices of the supreme, superior, family and district courts, general treasurer, state controller, the director of each state department, administrator of the division of public utilities and carriers, tax administrator, director of business regulation, the several town and city clerks, the several boards of canvassers and registration, the several probate courts where the clerk of the court is other than the city or town clerk, the several clerks or administrators of the supreme, superior, family and district courts, reporter of opinions of the supreme court, the several sheriffs, adjutant general, state judge advocate general, the division of occupational safety, the library of any accredited institution of higher education in the state of Rhode Island, Redwood Library and Athenaeum, the People’s Library, Newport, Providence Athenaeum, Providence Public Library, Pawtucket Free Public Library, any other incorporated library in the state or any library in the state receiving state aid that may apply for a copy, the social law library at Boston, Massachusetts, the New York Public Library, in New York, the library of the Worcester County Bar Association, Massachusetts, the library of the Johns Hopkins University, Maryland, the library at Cornell University, New York, the law schools at Cambridge and Boston in Massachusetts, at New York and at Albany in New York, at New Haven in Connecticut, the library of the University of West Virginia, in West Virginia, the bar library in Chicago, in Illinois, the library of the law school of Georgetown University in Washington, D.C., the state libraries of the several states, the senate committees on judiciary, finance and commerce, housing and municipal government, the house of representatives committees on judiciary, finance and corporations, the legislative council and the house of representatives finance committee advisory staff, each member of the general assembly, the associate justice of the Supreme Court of the United States assigned to the First Circuit, each district judge of the United States for the District of Rhode Island, the United States district attorney for the District of Rhode Island, the United States Marshal, the referee in bankruptcy for the District of Rhode Island, and the clerk of the United States District Court;

Four (4) copies to the Secretary of State of the United States;

Two (2) copies each to the state library, the state law library, the secretary of state, the attorney general, the public defender, the Legal Aid Society of Rhode Island, the Rhode Island Historical Society, the Newport Historical Society, and the Warden’s Court at New Shoreham.

The secretary of state shall keep two (2) copies for the use of his or her office.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 22, §§ 5-7; P.L. 1901, ch. 832, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, §§ 1218, 1219; G.L. 1909, ch. 28, §§ 5-7; P.L. 1910, ch. 541, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2050, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 28, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 307, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; P.L. 1944, ch. 1457, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 18; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, §§ 2, 4; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 16; G.L. 1956, §

43-2-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 6, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 522, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 25; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 36.

43-2-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 22, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 28, §§ 6, 8; P.L. 1921, ch. 2050, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 28, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 307, § 6; P.L. 1944, ch. 1456, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3279, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

43-2-6

; Repealed by P.L. 1970, ch. 55, § 3.

43-2-7.
Distribution of public laws.

The secretary of state shall retain the residue of the bound and unbound copies of the public laws and of the proceedings of the general assembly in his or her office for sale at the actual cost, except as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 28, § 7; P.L. 1921, ch. 2050, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 28, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 307, § 7; P.L. 1944, ch. 1456, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

43-2-7

; P.L. 1970, ch. 55, § 4; 1971, ch. 166, § 1.

43-2-8.
Distribution of official documents by governor.

The governor may transmit to the executive departments of the several states, to the executive departments of the United States, to the senators and representatives in congress, to the agents of foreign countries in the United States authorized to make exchanges for the documents, to the libraries, and to the state officers, boards and commissions hereafter created by the general assembly for use in the performance of their duties, as he or she may think proper, copies of all acts, resolutions, reports and other documents published under the authority of this state or of any officer thereof. There shall also be reserved for the governor twenty (20) copies of all bound volumes of the acts, resolutions, reports, and other public documents published under authority of the state, during his or her term of office, to be distributed as he or she shall see fit, upon his or her order as governor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 22, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 28, §§ 8, 9; P.L. 1921, ch. 2050, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 28, § 8; P.L. 1927, ch. 1007, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 307, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

43-2-8

.

43-2-9.
Exchanges by secretary of state.

The secretary of state may in his or her discretion transmit copies of acts, resolutions and reports published by him or her to any state, territory, province, or country which extends a similar privilege to the state library and, upon recommendation of the state librarian, he or she shall send in exchange to a designated depository in the state, territory, province, or country, in accordance with the provisions of §

29-1-5

, copies of acts, resolutions and reports published by him or her. The secretary of state may also transmit to any official receiving publications, in accordance with §

43-2-5

, copies of publications issued under authority of the state, and in his or her custody, to replace volumes, which have been mutilated or have become defective, upon receipt of the mutilated or defective volume in exchange.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 28, § 10; P.L. 1928, ch. 1170, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 307, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

43-2-9

.